Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.279

Violations—Secretary of state—Penalty—Hearing—Recovery in superior court.

(1) The secretary may assess against any entity that violates this chapter, or any rule adopted under this chapter, a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) The entity must be afforded the opportunity for a hearing, upon request made to the secretary within thirty days after the date of issuance of the notice of assessment. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) If any entity fails to pay an assessment after it has become a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of the state, the attorney general may recover the amount assessed by action in the appropriate superior court. In such action, the validity and appropriateness of the final order imposing the penalty shall not be subject to review.

[ 2011 c 199 s 22; 2002 c 74 s 3; 1993 c 471 s 21.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2002 c 74: See note following RCW 19.09.020.